src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection
!     ================

! э̄ а̄ ӣ о̄ ӯ ю̄ я̄ е̄
! stem _ [alienable poss.] _ number _ case _ [pers/refl. poss.]

!! ## Stem classes

LEXICON N_BIRA
 +N: X_BIRA ;

LEXICON X_BIRA
 +Sg+Nom:         POSS_SG_OTHER ; 
 +Sg+Acc:         CASE_ACC_SG ;
     +Sg:         CASE_OBL_VOW  ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>%{i%}л POSS_LN       ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%{i%}л CASE_ACC_PL ;
     +Pl:%>%{i%}л CASE_OBL_LN   ;

LEXICON N_UMUK
 +N: X_UMUK ;

LEXICON X_UMUK
 +Sg+Nom:         POSS_SG_CNS_NOM ;
 +Sg+Acc:         CASE_ACC_SG ;
     +Sg:         CASE_OBL_CNS    ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>%{i%}л POSS_LN         ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>%{i%}л CASE_ACC_PL ;
     +Pl:%>%{i%}л CASE_OBL_LN     ;

LEXICON N_ORON
 +N: X_ORON ;

LEXICON X_ORON
 +Sg+Nom:   POSS_LN     ;
 +Sg+Acc+Def:%>%{V%}%{A%} POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Винительный 
 +Sg+Acc+Ind:%>%{A%}        POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Вин.-неопред.
         CASE_ACC_SG ;
     +Sg:   CASE_OBL_LN ;
 +Pl+Nom: POSS_LN     ;
 +Pl+Acc+Def:%{V%}%{A%}        POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Винительный Accusative
 +Pl+Acc+Ind:%{A%}        POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Винительный-неопределёний Indefinite Acc

+Pl: CASE_OBL_LN ;

LEXICON N_XXX                               ! Pending categorisation
 +N+Sg+Nom: # ;

!! ## Stem subclasses

LEXICON CASE_OBL_VOW
  CASE_OBL_VOW_ONLY ;
  CASE_OBL_COMMON   ;
  INS_OTHER         ;

LEXICON CASE_OBL_CNS
  CASE_OBL_CNS_ONLY ;
  CASE_OBL_COMMON   ;
  INS_OTHER         ;

LEXICON CASE_OBL_LN
  CASE_OBL_CNS_ONLY ;
  CASE_OBL_COMMON   ;
  INS_LN            ;

!! ## Case morphology

LEXICON CASE_OBL_VOW_ONLY
 +Loc:%>л%{A%}{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Местный Locative
 +All:%>тки{ː%}    POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Направителый Allative
 +Prl:%>ли{ː%}     POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Продольный Prolative

LEXICON CASE_OBL_CNS_ONLY
 +Loc:%>%{D%}ул%{A%}{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Местный Locative
 +All:%>тыки{ː%}         POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Направителый Allative
 +Prl:%>%{D%}ули{ː%}     POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Продольный Prolative


LEXICON CASE_ACC_SG
 +Def:%>%{V%}%{A%}        POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Винительный Accusative
 +Ind:%>%{j%}%{A%}        POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Винительный-неопределёний Indefinite Acc

LEXICON CASE_ACC_PL
 +Def:%>%{V%}%{A%}        POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Винительный Accusative
 +Ind:%>%{A%}        POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Винительный-неопределёний Indefinite Acc

LEXICON CASE_OBL_COMMON
     +Dat:%>%{D%}у%{ː%}       POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Дателный Dative
     +Ter:%>%{i%}кл%{A%}%{ː%} POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Направительно-местный Terminative
     +Dir:%>%{i%}кли%{ː%}     POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Направительно-продольный Directive
     +Abl:%>%{D%}ук           POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Отложительный Ablative
     +Ela:%>%{G%}ит           POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Исходный Elative
     +Com:%>нун               POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Совместный Comitative


LEXICON INS_LN
 +Ins:%>ди POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Творительный Instrumental

LEXICON INS_OTHER
 +Ins:%>%{i%}т POSS_SG_OTHER ; ! Творительный Instrumental





!! Possessive suffix morphology

!! Different suffixes for consonant final,
!! LN nouns, and others. The three lexica
!! do also point directly to #.

LEXICON POSS_SG_CNS_NOM
                   # ;
  +PxSg1:%>в%{A%}  # ;
  +PxSg2:%>с%{A%}  # ;
  +PxSg3:%>н%{A%}  # ;
  +PxPl1:%>%{V%}ун # ;
 +PxPl12:%>%{V%}ун # ;
  +PxPl2:%>сун     # ;
  +PxPl3:%>тын     # ;

LEXICON POSS_LN
                       # ;
  +PxSg1:%>%{V%}и%{ː%} # ;
  +PxSg2:%>%{L%}и      # ;
  +PxSg3:%>ин          # ;
  +PxPl1:%>%{V%}ун     # ;
 +PxPl12:%>%{V%}ун     # ;
  +PxPl2:%>%{D%}ы      # ;
  +PxPl3:%>%{L%}ун     # ;

LEXICON POSS_SG_OTHER
                    # ;
  +PxSg1:%>%{i%}в   # ;
  +PxSg2:%>%{i%}с   # ;
  +PxSg3:%>%{i%}н   # ;
  +PxPl1:%>%{V%}ун  # ;
 +PxPl12:%>%{i%}т   # ;
  +PxPl2:%>%{i%}сун # ;
  +PxPl3:%>%{i%}тын # ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
